Maryland, session 2026, HB1208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
TITLE 7. EMERGENCY SERVICES.
7–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FIRST DUE AREA” MEANS A DELINEATED GEOGRAPHICAL AREA
APPROVED BY THE CALVERT COUNTY FIRE AND RESCUE COMMISSION IN WHICH A
VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD NORMALLY PROVIDES FIRE OR
RESCUE SERVICES IN THE EVENT OF A FIRE OR ANOTHER EMERGENCY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1208*

HOUSE BILL 1208
(C) “SUPPORT SERVICES ORGANIZATION” INCLUDES:
(1) CALVERT COUNTY FIRE COMPANIES AND RESCUE SQUADS;
(2) THE CALVERT ADVANCED LIFE SUPPORT UNIT;
(3) THE CALVERT COUNTY RESCUE DIVE TEAM; AND
(4) OTHER VOLUNTEER FIRE, RESCUE, AND MEDICAL ENTITIES AND
EMERGENCY SERVICE PROVIDERS DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
(D) “SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM” INCLUDES:
(1) DEBT SERVICE FOR FIRE–FIGHTING AND RESCUE EQUIPMENT,
APPARATUSES, AND FACILITIES;
(2) THE CALVERT COUNTY LENGTH OF SERVICE AWARD PROGRAM;
(3) CALVERT COUNTY VOLUNTEER RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION
PROGRAMS;
(4) CALVERT COUNTY PROPERTY TAX INCENTIVE PROGRAMS FOR
VOLUNTEERS; AND
(5) OTHER VOLUNTEER FIRE, RESCUE, MEDICAL, AND OTHER
EMERGENCY SERVICE PROGRAMS DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
7–102.
THE COUNTY MAY DISTRIBUTE A PORTION OF THE REVENUE COLLECTED
UNDER ANY PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES AGREEMENT IN EFFECT ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2026, IN AN AMOUNT THAT THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS DEEM
APPROPRIATE TO SUPPORT SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
PROGRAMS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
7–103.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
REVENUE COLLECTED UNDER ANY PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES AGREEMENT IN
EFFECT ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE
VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD FOR EACH FIRST DUE AREA IF THE
VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD:

HOUSE BILL 1208 3
(I) SUBMITS AN ANNUAL BUDGET AND A CERTIFIED
ACCOUNTING OF ALL EXPENDITURES TO THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS; AND
(II) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE AND THE COUNTY’S
FIRE AND RESCUE COMMISSION AND MAINTAINS ITS NONPROFIT CERTIFICATION
FROM THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PORTION OF THE REVENUE COLLECTED UNDER ANY PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES
AGREEMENT IN EFFECT ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED, IN
AMOUNTS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, TO:
(I) THE CALVERT ADVANCED LIFE SUPPORT UNIT IF THE
CALVERT ADVANCED LIFE SUPPORT UNIT:
1. SUBMITS AN ANNUAL BUDGET AND A CERTIFIED
ACCOUNTING OF ALL EXPENDITURES TO THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS; AND
2. IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE AND THE
COUNTY’S FIRE AND RESCUE COMMISSION AND MAINTAINS ITS NONPROFIT
CERTIFICATION FROM THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE;
(II) THE CALVERT COUNTY RESCUE DIVE TEAM IF THE
CALVERT COUNTY RESCUE DIVE TEAM:
1. SUBMITS AN ANNUAL BUDGET AND A CERTIFIED
ACCOUNTING OF ALL EXPENDITURES TO THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS; AND
2. IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE AND THE
COUNTY’S FIRE AND RESCUE COMMISSION AND MAINTAINS ITS NONPROFIT
CERTIFICATION FROM THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE;
(III) THE CALVERT COUNTY LENGTH OF SERVICE AWARD
PROGRAM;
(IV) CALVERT COUNTY VOLUNTEER RECRUITMENT AND
RETENTION PROGRAMS;
(V) CALVERT COUNTY PROPERTY TAX INCENTIVE PROGRAMS
FOR VOLUNTEERS; AND
(VI) OTHER SUPPORT SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS AND SUPPORT
SERVICES PROGRAMS DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.

HOUSE BILL 1208
(B) THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION BY A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD SHALL BE USED FOR
THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES WHEN APPROVED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE
VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD:
(1) PURCHASING, REPAIRING, REPLACING, OPERATING, AND
MAINTAINING FIRE–FIGHTING AND RESCUE EQUIPMENT AND APPARATUSES
INCLUDING RESCUE AND PERSONAL PROTECTION EQUIPMENT THAT CONFORMS TO
THE STANDARDS PRESCRIBED BY THE COUNTY’S FIRE AND RESCUE COMMISSION;
(2) FACILITIES TO STORE FIRE–FIGHTING AND RESCUE EQUIPMENT
AND APPARATUSES INCLUDING RESCUE AND PERSONAL PROTECTION EQUIPMENT;
AND
(3) TRAINING NEW VOLUNTEERS.
(C) A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD MAY NOT ADOPT ANY
RESOLUTION, REGULATION, OR BYLAW TO LIMIT OR RESTRICT THE TERRITORY:
(1) IN A FIRST DUE AREA WITHIN WHICH THE VOLUNTEER FIRE
COMPANY OR RESCUE SQUAD WILL RESPOND TO A CALL OR DISPATCH; OR
(2) IN THE COUNTY WITHIN WHICH THE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY
OR RESCUE SQUAD WILL RESPOND TO A CALL OR DISPATCH WHEN CALLED BY THE
PROPER AUTHORITY.
7–104.
EACH SUPPORT SERVICES ORGANIZATION THAT IS NOT A GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY SHALL GIVE BOND TO THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IN A PENAL
SUM TO BE SET BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS CONDITIONED UPON THE
FAITHFUL EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.